District of Columbia statutes.
11-1521

Establishment of Commission.

There shall be a District of Columbia Commission on Judicial Disabilities and Tenure (hereafter in this subchapter referred to as the “Commission”). The Commission shall have power to suspend, retire, or remove a judge of a District of Columbia court, as provided in this subchapter.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 492, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111

Cross References

Continuation of Commission, see § 1-207.18.
District Charter provisions relating to establishment of Commission, and its power to remove, suspend, or retire judges, see §§ 1-204.31 and 1-204.32.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-1521.
1973 Ed., § 11-1521.